inc/flattened/createYaml/yaml_output/VAI_IND_o.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:

  Lemma - ALL :

     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: ninagam
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: ginagam
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Excl: ninagamomin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+Incl: ginagamomin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: ginagamom
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgProx: nagamo
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlProx: nagamowag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3SgObv: nagamowan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3PlObv: [nagamowan,nagamowa']
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: nagamom
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: [ninagamosiin,ninagamosii]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: [ginagamosiin,ginagamosii]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Excl: ninagamosiimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+Incl: ginagamosiimin
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: ginagamosiim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgProx: [nagamosiin,nagamosii]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlProx: nagamosiiwag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3SgObv: nagamosiiwan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3PlObv: [nagamosiiwan,nagamosiiwa']
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: nagamosiim
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: ninagamonaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: ginagamonaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Excl: ninagamominaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Incl: ginagamominaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: ginagamomwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgProx: nagamooban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlProx: [nagamoobaniig,nagamoobaneg]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3SgObv: [nagamoobaniin,nagamoobanen]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3PlObv: [nagamoobaniin,nagamoobanen]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: nagamomwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: ninagamosiinaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: ginagamosiinaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Excl: ninagamosiiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Incl: ginagamosiiminaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: ginagamosiimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgProx: nagamosiiban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlProx: [nagamosiibaniig,nagamosiibaneg]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3SgObv: [nagamosiibaniin,nagamosiibanen]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3PlObv: [nagamosiibaniin,nagamosiibanen]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: nagamosiimwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: ninagamonaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: ginagamonaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Excl: ninagamominaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Incl: ginagamominaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: ginagamomwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgProx: [nagamowidog,nagamodog]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlProx: [nagamowidogenag,nagamodogenag]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3SgObv: [nagamowidogenan,nagamodogenan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3PlObv: [nagamowidogenan,nagamodogenan]
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: nagamomwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: ninagamosiinaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: ginagamosiinaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Excl: ninagamosiiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Incl: ginagamosiiminaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: ginagamosiimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgProx: nagamosiidog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlProx: nagamosiidogenag
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3SgObv: nagamosiidogenan
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3PlObv: [nagamosiidogenan,nagamosiidogena']
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: nagamosiimwaadog
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: nagamogoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: nagamogwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: nagamonigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgProx: nagamosiigoban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3PlProx: nagamosiigwaaban
     nagamo+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+Prt+3SgObv: nagamosiinigoban
